Illinois, session 104th, SB2108.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 2. The Illinois State Police Law of the Civil 5Administrative Code of Illinois is amended by adding Section 62605-625 as follows: 7    (20 ILCS 2605/2605-625 new)8    Sec. 2605-625. Technical managers workforce goals and 9report.10    (a) By August 1 of each calendar year, the Illinois State 11Police shall make a report in writing to the Governor and the 12General Assembly, stating in detail the Illinois State 13Police's efforts in the prior fiscal year to fill open 14technical manager positions.15    (b) The report shall include:16        (1) The total number of technical manager positions 17    within the Illinois State Police for the previous fiscal 18    year.19        (2) The number of technical manager positions that 20    were unfilled at any point during the previous fiscal 21    year.22        (3) The duration of time each technical manager 23    position remained unfilled.  SB2108 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 08359 LNS 18410 b1        (4) The number of technical manager positions filled 2    during the previous fiscal year.3        (5) A detailed report of any recruitment efforts or 4    initiatives undertaken to fill technical manager 5    positions.6    (c) The General Assembly may review the report and may 7request additional information or hold hearings regarding the 8Illinois State Police's staffing levels, recruitment 9strategies, and efforts. 10    Section 4. The State Finance Act is amended by changing 11Section 6z-82 as follows: 12    (30 ILCS 105/6z-82)13    Sec. 6z-82. State Police Operations Assistance Fund.14    (a) There is created in the State treasury a special fund 15known as the State Police Operations Assistance Fund. The Fund 16shall receive revenue under the Criminal and Traffic 17Assessment Act, the Illinois Hazardous Materials 18Transportation Act, and the Illinois Motor Carrier Safety Law. 19The Fund may also receive revenue from grants, donations, 20appropriations, and any other legal source.21    (a-5) This Fund may charge, collect, and receive fees or 22moneys as described in Section 15-312 of the Illinois Vehicle 23Code and receive all fees received by the Illinois State 24Police under that Section. The moneys shall be used by the   SB2108 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 08359 LNS 18410 b1Illinois State Police for its expenses in providing police 2escorts and commercial vehicle enforcement activities. 3    (b) The Illinois State Police may use moneys in the Fund to 4finance any of its lawful purposes or functions.5    (c) Expenditures may be made from the Fund only as 6appropriated by the General Assembly by law.7    (d) Investment income that is attributable to the 8investment of moneys in the Fund shall be retained in the Fund 9for the uses specified in this Section. 10    (e) The State Police Operations Assistance Fund shall not 11be subject to administrative chargebacks. 12    (f) (Blank).13    (g) (Blank). 14    (h) (Blank). June 9, 2023 (Public Act 103-34)15(Source: P.A. 102-16, eff. 6-17-21; 102-505, eff. 8-20-21; 16102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 103-34, eff. 176-9-23; 103-363, eff. 7-28-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-616, 18eff. 7-1-24; revised 7-23-24.) 19    Section 5. The Liquefied Petroleum Gas Regulation Act is 20amended by changing Section 3 as follows: 21    (430 ILCS 5/3)  (from Ch. 96 1/2, par. 5603)22    Sec. 3. The Office of the State Fire Marshal has power to 23make, adopt and enforce rules and regulations governing the 24storing, transporting as cargo, selling, dispensing or use of   SB2108 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 08359 LNS 18410 b1liquefied petroleum gases for purposes other than as a 2propellant fuel in school buses, except as otherwise regulated 3by the Illinois State Police Department of Transportation 4under the provisions of the "Illinois Hazardous Materials 5Transportation Act", approved August 26, 1977, as amended. 6Rules and regulations adopted under this Section shall be in 7substantial conformity with the generally accepted standards 8of safety concerning the same subject matter. Rules and 9regulations in substantial conformity with the published 10Standards of the National Fire Protection Association for the 11Storage and Handling of Liquefied Petroleum Gases and with the 12published Recommended Good Practice Rules for Liquefied 13Petroleum Gas Piping and Appliance Installations in Buildings 14as recommended by the National Fire Protection Association, 15shall be considered in substantial conformity with the 16generally accepted standards of safety. No municipality or 17other political subdivision shall enforce any ordinance or 18regulation in conflict with this Act or with the regulations 19promulgated under this Section, except in the location and 20operation of liquefied petroleum gas bulk plants and storage 21systems of over 1200 gallon capacity.22(Source: P.A. 83-1362.) 23    Section 10. The Illinois Hazardous Materials 24Transportation Act is amended by changing Sections 2, 3, and 2511 as follows:   SB2108 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 08359 LNS 18410 b1    (430 ILCS 30/2)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 700-2)2    Sec. 2. It is the finding of the General Assembly that 3hazardous materials are essential for various industrial, 4commercial and other purposes; that their transportation is a 5necessary incident to their use; and that such transportation 6is required for the employment and economic prosperity of the 7People of the State of Illinois.8    It is therefore declared to be the policy of the General 9Assembly to improve the regulatory and enforcement authority 10of the Illinois State Police Department of Transportation to 11protect the People of the State of Illinois against the risk to 12life and property inherent in the transportation of hazardous 13materials over highways by keeping such risk to a minimum 14consistent with technical feasibility and economic 15reasonableness.16    It is not the intent of the General Assembly to regulate 17the movement of hazardous materials in such quantities that 18would not pose a substantial danger to the public health and 19safety, such as fuels, fertilizer and agricultural chemicals 20while being used in a normal farming operation or in transit to 21the farm.22(Source: P.A. 80-351.) 23    (430 ILCS 30/3)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 700-3)24    Sec. 3. Unless the context otherwise clearly requires, as   SB2108 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 08359 LNS 18410 b1used in this Act:2    "Commerce" means trade, traffic, commerce or 3transportation within the State;4    "Department" means the Illinois State Police Department of 5Transportation;6    "Discharge" means leakage, seepage, or other release;7    "Hazardous material" means a substance or material in a 8quantity and form determined by the United States Department 9of Transportation to be capable of posing an unreasonable risk 10to health and safety or property when transported in commerce;11    "Knowingly" means a person has actual knowledge of the 12facts giving rise to the violation or a reasonable person 13acting in the circumstances and exercising due care would have 14such knowledge;15    "Law Enforcement Officials" means the Illinois State 16Police or any duly authorized employees of a local 17governmental agency who are primarily responsible for 18prevention or detection of crime and enforcement of the 19criminal code and the highway and traffic laws of this State or 20any political subdivision of such State;21    "Local road" means any State or local highway except for 22(i) a highway with 4 or more lanes, or (ii) an interstate 23highway. 24    "Person" means any natural person or individual, 25governmental body, firm, association, partnership, 26copartnership, joint venture, company, corporation, joint   SB2108 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 08359 LNS 18410 b1stock company, trust, estate or any other legal entity or 2their legal representative, agent or assigns;3    "Transports" or "transportation" means any movement of 4property over the highway and any loading, unloading or 5storage incidental to such movement.6(Source: P.A. 102-513, eff. 8-20-21.) 7    (430 ILCS 30/11)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 700-11)8    Sec. 11. Any person who is determined by the Department 9after reasonable notice and opportunity for a fair and 10impartial hearing to have knowingly committed an act that is a 11violation of this Act or any rule or regulation issued under 12this Act is liable to the State for a civil penalty. Whoever 13knowingly commits an act that is a violation of any rule or 14regulation applicable to any person who transports or ships or 15causes to be transported or shipped hazardous materials is 16subject to a civil penalty of not more than $10,000 for such 17violation and, if any such violation is a continuing one, each 18day of violation constitutes a separate offense. The amount of 19any such penalty shall be assessed by the Department by a 20written notice. In determining the amount of such penalty, the 21Department shall take into account the nature, circumstances, 22extent and gravity of the violation and, with respect to a 23person found to have committed such violation, the degree of 24culpability, history of prior offenses, ability to pay, effect 25on ability to continue to do business and such other matters as   SB2108 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 08359 LNS 18410 b1justice may require.2    Such civil penalty is recoverable in an action brought by 3the State's Attorney or the Attorney General on behalf of the 4State in the circuit court or, prior to referral to the State's 5Attorney or the Attorney General, such civil penalty may be 6compromised by the Department. The amount of such penalty when 7finally determined (or agreed upon in compromise), may be 8deducted from any sums owed by the State to the person charged. 9All civil penalties collected under this Section shall be 10deposited in the State Police Operations Assistance Road Fund.11(Source: P.A. 80-351.) 12    Section 15. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by 13changing Sections 1-115.05, 18b-101, 18b-102, 18b-104, 1418b-106.2, 18b-107, and 18b-109 and by adding Sections 1518b-104.1 and 18b-104.2 as follows: 16    (625 ILCS 5/1-115.05)17    Sec. 1-115.05. Department. The Department of 18Transportation of the State of Illinois, acting directly or 19through its duly authorized officers and agents, except that: 20(i) in Chapter 5 and Articles X and XI of Chapter 3 of this 21Code, "Department" means the Department of Revenue of the 22State of Illinois; and (ii) in Chapter 18B, "Department" means 23the Illinois State Police.24(Source: P.A. 90-89, eff. 1-1-98.)   SB2108 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 08359 LNS 18410 b1    (625 ILCS 5/18b-101)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 18b-101)2    Sec. 18b-101. Definitions. Unless the context otherwise 3clearly requires, as used in this Chapter:4    "Agricultural commodities" means any agricultural 5commodity, non-processed food, feed, fiber, or livestock, 6including insects.7    "Agricultural operations" means the operation of a motor 8vehicle or combination of vehicles transporting agricultural 9commodities or farm supplies for agricultural purposes. 10    "Air mile" means a nautical mile, which is equivalent to 116,076 feet or 1,852 meters. Accordingly, 100 air miles are 12equivalent to 115.08 statute miles or 185.2 kilometers. 13    "Commercial motor vehicle" means any self propelled or 14towed vehicle used on public highways in interstate and 15intrastate commerce to transport passengers or property when 16the vehicle has a gross vehicle weight, a gross vehicle weight 17rating, a gross combination weight, or a gross combination 18weight rating of 10,001 or more pounds; or the vehicle is used 19or designed to transport more than 15 passengers, including 20the driver; or the vehicle is designed to carry 15 or fewer 21passengers and is operated by a contract carrier transporting 22employees in the course of their employment on a highway of 23this State; or the vehicle is used or designed to transport 24between 9 and 15 passengers, including the driver, for direct 25compensation; or the vehicle is used in the transportation of   SB2108 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 08359 LNS 18410 b1hazardous materials in a quantity requiring placarding under 2the Illinois Hazardous Materials Transportation Act. This 3definition shall not include farm machinery, fertilizer 4spreaders, and other special agricultural movement equipment 5described in Section 3-809 nor implements of husbandry as 6defined in Section 1-130.7    "Covered farm vehicle", for purposes of this Chapter and 8rule-making under this Chapter, means a straight truck or 9articulated vehicle, excluding vehicles transporting hazardous 10materials of a type or quantity that requires the vehicle to be 11placarded in accordance with the Illinois Hazardous Materials 12Transportation Act, registered in this State or another state 13and equipped with a special license plate or other designation 14by the state in which the vehicle is registered identifying 15the vehicle as a covered farm vehicle for law enforcement 16personnel and: 17        (1) is operated by a farm or ranch owner or operator, 18    or an employee or family member of the farm or ranch owner 19    or operator; and 20        (2) is being used to transport the following to or 21    from a farm or ranch: 22            (A) agricultural commodities; 23            (B) livestock; or 24            (C) machinery or supplies; and 25        (3) if registered in this State, is: 26            (A) registered as a farm truck under subsection   SB2108 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 08359 LNS 18410 b1        (c) of Section 3-815 of this Code; or 2            (B) operated in combination as an articulated 3        vehicle when the truck in the combination is 4        registered for 12,000 lbs. or less as a covered farm 5        vehicle under subsections (a) and (a-5) of Section 6        3-815 of this Code or subsection (a) of Section 3-818 7        of this Code and contains in the cab of the motor 8        vehicle a registration designating the vehicle as a 9        covered farm vehicle under subsections (a) and (a-5) 10        of Section 3-815 of this Code and the trailer in the 11        combination is registered as a farm trailer under 12        subsection (a) of Section 3-819 of this Code and 13        displays a farm registration license plate; or 14            (C) a truck registered for 12,000 lbs. or less as a 15        covered farm vehicle under subsections (a) and (a-5) 16        of Section 3-815 of this Code or subsection (a) of 17        Section 3-818 of this Code containing in the cab of the 18        motor vehicle a registration designating the vehicle 19        as a covered farm vehicle under subsections (a) and 20        (a-5) of Section 3-815 of this Code that is towing an 21        implement of husbandry as part of a farming operation; 22        and 23        (4) is not used in for-hire motor carrier operations; 24    however, for-hire motor carrier operations do not include 25    the operation of a vehicle meeting the definition of a 26    covered farm vehicle by a tenant pursuant to a crop share   SB2108 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 08359 LNS 18410 b1    farm lease agreement to transport the landlord's portion 2    of the crops under that agreement; and 3        (5) has a gross vehicle weight rating (GVWR), a gross 4    combination weight rating (GCWR), or a gross vehicle 5    weight or gross vehicle combination weight, whichever is 6    greater, that is: 7            (A) 26,001 lbs. or less, for vehicles operating in 8        interstate commerce; or 9            (B) greater than 26,001 lbs., operating in 10        interstate commerce and registered in this State; or 11            (C) greater than 26,001 lbs. and traveling 12        interstate within 150 air miles of the farm or ranch 13        for which the vehicle is being operated, regardless of 14        whether it is registered in this State; or 15            (D) greater than 10,000 lbs. and traveling 16        intrastate. 17    "Department" means the Illinois State Police. 18    "Direct compensation" means payment made to the motor 19carrier by the passengers or a person acting on behalf of the 20passengers for the transportation services provided, and not 21included in a total package charge or other assessment for 22highway transportation services.23    "Farm supplies for agricultural purposes" means products 24directly related to the growing or harvesting of agricultural 25commodities and livestock feed at any time of the year.26    "Livestock" means cattle, sheep, goats, swine, poultry   SB2108 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 08359 LNS 18410 b1(including egg-producing poultry), fish used for food, and 2other animals designated by the Secretary of the United States 3Department of Transportation (at his or her sole discretion) 4that are part of a foundation herd (including producing dairy 5cattle) or offspring. 6    "Officer" means Illinois State Police Officer.7    "Person" means any natural person or individual, 8governmental body, firm, association, partnership, 9copartnership, joint venture, company, corporation, joint 10stock company, trust, estate or any other legal entity or 11their legal representative, agent or assigns.12(Source: P.A. 97-795, eff. 1-1-13; 98-882, eff. 8-13-14.) 13    (625 ILCS 5/18b-102)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 18b-102)14    Sec. 18b-102. Authority of Department. To the extent 15necessary to administer this Chapter, the Department is 16authorized to:17    (a) Adopt by reference all or any portion of the Federal 18Motor Carrier Safety Regulations of the United States 19Department of Transportation, as they are now or hereafter 20amended.21    (b) Conduct investigations; make reports; issue subpoenas; 22conduct hearings; require the production of relevant 23documents, records and property; take depositions; and, in 24conjunction with the Illinois State Police, conduct directly 25or indirectly research, development, demonstrations and   SB2108 Enrolled- 14 -LRB104 08359 LNS 18410 b1training activities.2    (c) Authorize any officer or Department employee to enter 3upon, inspect and examine at reasonable times and in a 4reasonable manner, the records and properties of persons to 5the extent such records and properties relate to the 6transportation by motor vehicle of persons or property.7    (d) Conduct a continuing review of all aspects of the 8transportation of persons and property by motor vehicle in 9order to determine and recommend appropriate steps to assure 10safe transportation by motor vehicle in Illinois.11    (e) Administer and enforce the provisions of this Chapter 12and any rules and regulations issued under this Chapter. Only 13the Department Illinois State Police shall be authorized to 14stop and inspect any commercial motor vehicle or driver at any 15time for the purpose of determining compliance with the 16provisions of this Chapter or rules and regulations issued 17under this Chapter.18(Source: P.A. 90-89, eff. 1-1-98.) 19    (625 ILCS 5/18b-104)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 18b-104)20    Sec. 18b-104. Cooperation with State Agencies - Records 21and Data - Availability. The Department shall cooperate with 22other State agencies regulating transportation by motor 23vehicles and may enter into interagency agreements for the 24purpose of sharing data. The Department shall enter into an 25interagency agreement with the Illinois State Police for the   SB2108 Enrolled- 15 -LRB104 08359 LNS 18410 b1purpose of enforcing any provisions of this Chapter and the 2rules and regulations issued under this Chapter.3(Source: P.A. 86-611.) 4    (625 ILCS 5/18b-104.1 new)5    Sec. 18b-104.1. Personnel transfers. 6    (a) On January 1, 2026, the personnel responsible for 7administering this Chapter are transferred from the 8transferring agency designated by the Governor to the 9Department. Prior to the transfer, the personnel shall be 10subject to a background check and any additional screening 11requirements established by the Department. The status and 12rights of the employees and the State or its transferring 13agency under the Personnel Code, the Illinois Public Labor 14Relations Act, and applicable collective bargaining agreements 15or under any pension, retirement, or annuity plan shall not be 16affected by this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly. 17Under the direction of the Governor, the Department, in 18consultation with the transferring agencies, Central 19Management Services, and labor organizations representing the 20affected employees, shall identify each position and employee 21who is engaged in the performance of functions transferred to 22the Department, or engaged in the administration of a law the 23administration of which is transferred to the Department, to 24be transferred to the Department. An employee engaged 25primarily in providing administrative and investigative   SB2108 Enrolled- 16 -LRB104 08359 LNS 18410 b1support to the Illinois Motor Carrier Safety Assistance 2Program may be considered engaged in the performance of 3functions transferred to the Department.4    (b) Until October 1, 2026, all union employees assigned to 5the Motor Carrier Safety Assistance Program shall retain the 6rights and benefits of their collective bargaining agreement, 7including, but not limited to, for personnel transactions, as 8if the employees were still employed by the Department of 9Transportation. As used in this subsection, "personnel 10transactions" includes promotions, lateral transfers, or 11voluntary reductions to other union titles within the 12Department of Transportation.  13    (625 ILCS 5/18b-104.2 new)14    Sec. 18b-104.2. Material transfers. On January 1, 2026, 15the Department shall take possession from the Department of 16Transportation any tangible items, including, but not limited 17to, vehicles, computers, uniforms, equipment, and supplies, 18which were procured or purchased using the Motor Carrier 19Safety Assistance Program Grant from the Federal Motor Carrier 20Safety Administration. These items shall become property of 21the Department. 22    (625 ILCS 5/18b-106.2)23    Sec. 18b-106.2. Hours of service; utility service 24interruption emergencies.  SB2108 Enrolled- 17 -LRB104 08359 LNS 18410 b1    (a) As used in this Section:2    "Commercial driver's license" has the meaning set forth in 3Section 1-111.6 of this Code.4    "Commercial motor vehicle" has the meaning set forth in 5Section 18b-101 of this Code.6    "Utility service interruption emergency" means an outage 7or interruption of utility service in Illinois occasioned by a 8set of circumstances included in the definition of "emergency" 9set forth at 49 CFR 390.5.10    "Utility service" means the repairing, maintaining, or 11operating of any structures or any other physical facilities 12necessary for the delivery of utility services, including the 13furnishing of electric, gas, water, sanitary sewer, telephone, 14and television cable or community antenna service.15    "Utility service vehicle" has the meaning set forth in 49 16CFR 395.2.17    (b) Upon receipt of notification of a utility service 18interruption emergency by a utility service provider, the 19Illinois Department of Transportation shall declare that an 20emergency exists pursuant to 49 CFR 390.23. Should an audit by 21the Illinois Department of Transportation establish that there 22has been an abuse of the notification procedure by a utility 23service provider, the Illinois Department of Transportation 24may refuse to grant emergency declarations to that utility 25service provider in the future without further confirmation of 26the existence of a utility service interruption emergency.  SB2108 Enrolled- 18 -LRB104 08359 LNS 18410 b1    (c) A utility service interruption emergency continues 2until:3        (1) the necessary maintenance or repair work is 4    completed; and5        (2) personnel used to perform necessary maintenance or 6    repair work have returned to their respective normal work 7    routines.8    (d) An individual is exempt from any regulation of the 9maximum hours of service that an employee may work under 49 CFR 10395 if he or she:11        (1) is the holder of a commercial driver's license;12        (2) is:13            (A) an employee;14            (B) an employee of a contractor; or15            (C) an employee of a subcontractor;16    of a utility service provider in an employment capacity in 17    which the commercial driver's license is used; and18        (3) operates a commercial motor vehicle as a utility 19    service vehicle and engages in intrastate maintenance or 20    repair work in response to a utility service interruption 21    emergency.22    (e) The exemption from maximum hours of service 23regulations provided under subsection (d) shall not exceed the 24duration of the utility service provider's or driver's direct 25assistance in providing utility service interruption emergency 26relief, or 5 days from the date of the initial declaration,   SB2108 Enrolled- 19 -LRB104 08359 LNS 18410 b1whichever is less.2    (f) Nothing in this amendatory Act of the 94th General 3Assembly shall be construed to contravene any federal law or 4to jeopardize State of Illinois entitlement to federal 5funding. If any provision of this amendatory Act of the 94th 6General Assembly or its application is found to jeopardize 7federal funding, that provision is declared invalid but does 8not affect any other provision or application. The provisions 9of this amendatory Act of the 94th General Assembly are 10declared to be severable.11(Source: P.A. 94-1, eff. 5-23-05.) 12    (625 ILCS 5/18b-107)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 18b-107)13    Sec. 18b-107. Violations - Civil penalties. Except as 14provided in Section 18b-108, any person who is determined by 15the Department after reasonable notice and opportunity for a 16fair and impartial hearing to have committed an act in 17violation of this Chapter or any rule or regulation issued 18under this Chapter is liable to the State for a civil penalty. 19Such person is subject to a civil penalty as prescribed by 20Appendix B to 49 CFR Part 386 -- Penalty Schedule; Violations 21and Maximum Monetary Penalties, except that a person 22committing a railroad-highway grade crossing violation is 23subject to a civil penalty of not more than $10,000, and, if 24any such violation is a continuing one, each day of violation 25constitutes a separate offense. The amount of any such penalty   SB2108 Enrolled- 20 -LRB104 08359 LNS 18410 b1shall be assessed by the Department by a written notice. In 2determining the amount of such penalty, the Department shall 3take into account the nature, circumstances, extent and 4gravity of the violation and, with respect to a person found to 5have committed such violation, the degree of culpability, 6history or prior offenses, ability to pay, effect on ability 7to continue to do business and such other matters as justice 8may require.9    Such civil penalty is recoverable in an action brought by 10the State's Attorney or the Attorney General on behalf of the 11State in the circuit court or, prior to referral to the State's 12Attorney or the Attorney General, such civil penalty may be 13compromised by the Department. The amount of such penalty when 14finally determined (or agreed upon in compromise), may be 15deducted from any sums owed by the State to the person charged. 16All civil penalties collected under this subsection shall be 17deposited in the State Police Operations Assistance Fund Road 18Fund.19    On the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th 20General Assembly, the hearing process established by this 21Section shall be completed by the Department. All such 22violations dated prior to the effective date of this 23amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly shall be 24completed by the Department of Transportation. 25(Source: P.A. 94-519, eff. 8-10-05.)   SB2108 Enrolled- 21 -LRB104 08359 LNS 18410 b1    (625 ILCS 5/18b-109)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 18b-109)2    Sec. 18b-109. Enforcement of Rules and Regulations. Only 3the Department Illinois State Police shall enforce the rules 4and regulations issued under this Chapter against drivers and 5persons other than drivers. The Department and the Illinois 6State Police shall enforce the rules and regulations issued 7under this Chapter against persons other than drivers.8(Source: P.A. 86-611.) 9    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect October 101, 2025.